Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-102 Insurance commissioner.
(a) The insurance division shall be under the supervision and control of an
administrator who shall be known as the insurance commissioner. The director
of commerce and consumer affairs shall, with the approval of the governor,
appoint the insurance commissioner who shall not be subject to chapter 76. The
insurance commissioner shall hold the insurance commissioner's office at the
pleasure of the director of commerce and consumer affairs and shall be
responsible for the performance of the duties imposed upon the division.

(b) Commissioner, where used in this code,
means the insurance commissioner of this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next